Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.130

Board of trustees—Terms—Vacancies.

The members of the first board in any district shall classify themselves by lot at their first meeting so that:

(1) If the total membership is an even number, the terms of one-half the members will expire at the end of one year, and the terms of the remainder at the end of two years, from the second day of the calendar year next succeeding their appointment.

(2) If the total membership is an odd number, the terms of a bare majority of the members will expire at the end of one year, and the terms of the remainder at the end of two years, from the second day of the calendar year next succeeding their appointment.

The term of each subsequent member is two years from and after the expiration of the term of his or her predecessor.

In event of the resignation, death, or disability of any member, his or her successor shall be appointed by the governing body which appointed him or her.

[ 2011 c 336 s 466; 1957 c 153 s 13.]